Hawaii statutes.
§171-8 Land agents and other employees.
The board shall be represented in each land district by a district land agent.
The board may employ other necessary employees.

The district land agent shall exercise the
powers and duties delegated by the board and shall report to the designated
representative of the board.

The appointment, removal, and compensation of
district land agents and other employees shall be determined in accordance with
chapter 76. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; am L 1965, c 202, §1; Supp, §103A-8; HRS
§171-8; am L 1971, c 154, §1; am L 1981, c 116, §3; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next